Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1720.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 2002, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2002. A. All parental rights are reserved to a parent


of a minor child without obstruction or interference from this


state, any political subdivision of this state, any other

Req. No. 3303 Page 1


governmental entity, or any other institution, including, but not


limited to, the following rights:


1. The right to direct the education of the minor child;


2. All rights of parents identified in Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, including the right to access and review all school


records relating to the minor child;


3. The right to direct the upbringing of the minor child;


4. The right to direct the moral or religious training of the


minor child;


5. The right to make healthcare health care decisions for the


minor child, unless otherwise prohibited by law;


6. The right to access and review all medical records of the


minor child unless otherwise prohibited by law or the parent is the


subject of an investigation of a crime committed against the minor


child and a law enforcement official requests that the information


not be released;


7. The right to consent in writing before a biometric scan of


the minor child is made, shared, or stored;


8. The right to consent in writing before any record of the


minor child’s blood or deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) is created,


stored, or shared, except as required by Sections 1-516 and 1-524.1


of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or unless authorized pursuant


to a court order;



Req. No. 3303 Page 2


9. The right to consent in writing before the state or any of


its political subdivisions makes a video or voice recording of the


minor child, unless the video or voice recording is made during or


as a part of a court proceeding, by law enforcement officers during


or as part of a law enforcement investigation, during or as part of


a forensic interview in a criminal or Department of Human Services


investigation, or to be used solely for any of the following:


a. safety demonstrations, including the maintenance of


order and discipline in the common areas of a school


or on student transportation vehicles,


b. a purpose related to a legitimate academic or


extracurricular activity,


c. a purpose related to regular classroom instruction,


d. security or surveillance of buildings or grounds, and


e. a photo identification card; and


10. The right to be notified promptly if an employee of this


state, any political subdivision of this state, any other


governmental entity, or any other institution suspects that a


criminal offense has been committed against the minor child by


someone other than a parent, unless the incident has first been


reported to law enforcement and notification of the parent would


impede a law enforcement or Department of Human Services


investigation. This paragraph does not create any new obligation


for school districts and charter schools to report misconduct

Req. No. 3303 Page 3


between students at school, such as fighting or aggressive play,


that is routinely addressed as a student disciplinary matter by the


school;


11. The right to bring any individual of the parent’s choosing,


including an individual with unique knowledge or expertise regarding


the child, to any meeting with school personnel including, but not


limited to, meetings regarding an individualized education program


(IEP) pursuant to the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act


(IDEA), meetings conducted pursuant to Section 504 of the


Rehabilitation Act of 1973, and meetings concerning the academics,


behavior, discipline, attendance, health, or any other matter


involving the child;


12. The right, upon written request, to receive copies of all


education records of a minor child as defined by the Family


Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (FERPA) within ten (10)


business days of receipt of the written request. Copies shall be


provided at no cost to the parent. A parent shall also have the


right, upon written request, to receive annual notification from a


school district of the procedures for requesting such records;


13. The right to review all documents including, but not


limited to, evaluations, reports, progress monitoring data, work


samples, behavior logs, and discipline records, at least five (5)


business days prior to any meeting regarding an IEP, a meeting


conducted pursuant to Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973,

Req. No. 3303 Page 4


or any other meeting regarding accommodations for a student with a


disability. A parent may agree in writing to a review period of


fewer than five (5) business days; and


14. The right to receive from a school district a written


incident report by no later than the end of the business day on


which his or her child is suspected of having been injured, involved


in an alleged incident of bullying, or is the alleged victim or


perpetrator of conduct requiring such notice pursuant to the School


Safety and Bullying Prevention Act. A copy of the incident report


shall be maintained in the student’s education record and shall


include at a minimum:


a. the time, date, and location of the incident,


b. a description of the injury or alleged conduct,


c. actions taken by school personnel including first aid


or disciplinary actions,


d. the names and titles of school personnel who witnessed


or responded to the incident,


e. whether law enforcement or the Department of Human


Services was notified, and


f. the name and contact information of the school


employee designated for further contact.


B. This section does not authorize or allow a parent to engage


in conduct that is unlawful or to abuse or neglect a child in


violation of the laws of this state. This section shall not be

Req. No. 3303 Page 5


construed to apply to a parental action or decision that would end


life. This section does not prohibit courts, law enforcement


officers, or employees of a government agency responsible for child


welfare from acting in their official capacity within the reasonable


and prudent scope of their authority. This section does not


prohibit a court from issuing an order that is otherwise permitted


by law.


C. Any attempt to encourage or coerce a minor child to withhold


information from the child’s parent shall be grounds for discipline


of an employee of this state, any political subdivision of this


state, or any other governmental entity, except for law enforcement


personnel.


D. Unless those rights have been legally waived or legally


terminated, parents have inalienable rights that are more


comprehensive than those listed in this section. The Parents’ Bill


of Rights does not prescribe all rights of parents. Unless


otherwise required by law, the rights of parents of minor children


shall not be limited or denied. The Parents’ Bill of Rights shall


not be construed to apply to a parental action or decision that


would end life.


E. 1. No state agency, political subdivision of this state,


public school district, charter school, virtual charter school, or


employee or contractor of any such entity shall intimidate,



Req. No. 3303 Page 6


threaten, coerce, discipline, discriminate against, or otherwise


retaliate against a parent or minor child because:


a. the parent exercised or attempted to exercise any


right provided pursuant to this section, Title 70 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, or federal law including, but


not limited to, IDEA, Section 504 of the


Rehabilitation Act of 1973, the Americans with


Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA), Title VI of the Civil


Rights Act of 1964, or Title IX of the Education


Amendments of 1972,


b. the parent made a complaint, provided information, or


otherwise cooperated with any investigation, hearing,


or proceeding regarding the education, services,


discipline, or safety of his or her minor child, or


c. the parent assisted or encouraged another parent in


exercising rights protected by the laws of this state


or by federal law.


2. For the purposes of this subsection, “retaliate” or


“retaliation” includes, but is not limited to:


a. excluding or barring a parent from school property or


school meetings, except as permitted by a court order


or where necessary to address an actual, documented


safety threat,



Req. No. 3303 Page 7


b. materially limiting a parent’s opportunity to


participate in meetings or decisions about his or her


minor child,


c. initiating a report to law enforcement or the


Department of Human Services in violation of


subsection D of Section 1-2-101 of Title 10A of the


Oklahoma Statutes against a parent because of his or


her advocacy,


d. taking adverse action against a student including


changes in placement, services, or discipline that


would not otherwise have been taken but for the


parent’s advocacy, or


e. failure to provide proper notice of any proceeding,


meeting, or disbursement of relative information.


F. 1. A parent who is aggrieved by a knowing and willful


violation of the provisions of this section by a public school


district, charter school, or virtual charter school may:


a. submit a written complaint with the board of education


of a public school district or the governing body of


the charter school or virtual charter school which


shall issue a written response within fifteen (15)


business days of receipt of the complaint describing


any corrective action to be taken, and



Req. No. 3303 Page 8


b. if dissatisfied with the response from the board of


education of the public school district or the


governing body of the charter school or virtual


charter school or if no response is provided within


the time period prescribed by subparagraph a of this


paragraph, submit a written complaint to the State


Department of Education.


2. Upon receipt of a written complaint pursuant to paragraph 1


of this subsection, the State Department of Education shall


investigate the alleged violation. If the Department finds evidence


of a violation of the provisions of this section, it may require the


public school district, charter school, or virtual charter school to


take corrective action. For repeated or willful violations, the


Department may make a recommendation to the State Board of Education


that accreditation penalties be imposed upon or that a portion of


State Aid be withheld from the school district, charter school, or


virtual charter school.


3. In addition to any other remedy available, a parent whose


rights provided by this section have been violated may bring a civil


action against the public school district, charter school, or


virtual charter school for:


a. declaratory and injunctive relief,


b. actual damages including, but not limited to, the cost


of obtaining replacement services or private

Req. No. 3303 Page 9


educational services made necessary by the violation,


and


c. reasonable attorney fees and court costs, if the


parent is the prevailing party.


4. Civil actions brought pursuant to this section shall be


automatically sealed unless expressly waived by the petitioner or


upon agreement of the parties involved.


5. A cause of action brought pursuant to paragraph 3 of this


subsection shall be filed within two (2) years of when the parent


knew or reasonably should have known of the violation.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3303 EB 1/14/2026 11:55:09 AM















Req. No. 3303 Page 10